Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7679.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30-25 of the General Laws entitled "Burial of Veterans" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
30-25-14.1. Eligibility for burial -- Members of special guerrilla units.
(a) Purpose. The general assembly finds that certain individuals served honorably in
Hmong Laotian special guerrilla units or irregular forces operating in support of the United States
Armed Forces during the conflict in the Kingdom of Laos and surrounding regions between 1961
and 1975, commonly known as the "Secret War." These individuals fought alongside United States
military personnel, sustained heavy casualties, and have been recognized by acts of the United
States Congress and the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs for their service.
(b) Eligibility. Any person who:
(1) Served honorably in a Hmong Laotian special guerrilla unit or irregular forces
operations, as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 2402(a)(10), in support of the United States Armed Forces;
and
(2) Has been determined by the United States Department of Veterans’ Affairs to be
eligible for burial in a national cemetery pursuant to 38 U.S.C. § 2402(a)(10), shall be deemed
eligible for burial in the Rhode Island Veterans Memorial Cemetery (RIVMC), subject to all other
conditions and rules applicable to interment therein. The RIVMC may request a determination from
the Department of Veterans’ Affairs as to whether a person is eligible for burial in a national
cemetery under 38 U.S.C. § 2402(a)(10) and may rely on that determination in ascertaining

eligibility for burial at the RIVMC.
(c) Documentation. The RIVMC may establish eligibility by accepting the same evidence
of service that the Department of Veterans’ Affairs requires to determine eligibility for interment
in national veterans’ cemeteries.
(d) Federal compliance. Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand eligibility for
burial beyond those categories recognized under federal law or to jeopardize the state’s receipt of
federal funds or grants for the operation or maintenance of the Rhode Island Veterans Memorial
Cemetery.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004890/SUB A
========
LC004890/SUB A - Page 2 of 3